dictionary/ku_TR.aff
KEEPCASE K

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# ku_TR.aff — Hunspell Affix File for Kurdish Kurmanci (Northern Kurdish)
# Kurdish Tech Organization | Open Source
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
#
# LANGUAGE: Kurdish Kurmanci (Kurmanji) — Latin alphabet
# LOCALE:   ku_TR (Kurdish as used in Turkey/Northern region, Latin script)
#
# This file defines the morphological rules used by nspell/Hunspell to:
#   1. Validate words by applying affix stripping rules.
#   2. Generate spelling suggestions.
#
# ── HOW TO CONTRIBUTE ────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
# This is a STARTER / TEMPLATE affix file for Kurmanci.
# A linguist familiar with Kurmanci morphology should expand the SFX/PFX rules.
#
# Key resources:
#   - Kurmanci grammar references (Bedirxan & Lescot 1970)
#   - Rêzimana Kurdî (Kurdish Grammar by Amir Hassanpour)
#   - Ferheng.org — Kurmanci-Kurdish dictionary project
#   - GitHub: freedict/fd-dictionaries (Kurdish entries)
# ─────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────

# ── Encoding ──────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
SET UTF-8

# ── Word character set ────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Kurmanci Latin alphabet characters (standard + special):
#   Vowels:    a, e, ê, i, î, o, u, û
#   Consonants: b, c, ç, d, f, g, h, j, k, l, m, n, p, q, r, s, ş, t, v, w, x, y, z
TRY aeiouêîûbcçdfghjklmnpqrştvwxyzAEIOUÊÎÛBCÇDFGHJKLMNPQRŞTVWXYZ

# ── Suggestion mechanics ──────────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Maximum number of compound word suggestions
MAXCPDSUGS 3

# Word break characters
WORDCHARS '-

# Ignore characters (strip these before checking)
IGNORE '

# ── Case sensitivity ──────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Kurdish proper nouns are capitalised — enable case-insensitive flag
CHECKSHARPS

# ── Compounding ───────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Kurdish Kurmanci forms compound words (e.g., xwendekar, malxweyî)
# COMPOUNDMIN sets the minimum length of compound parts
COMPOUNDMIN 3

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# SUFFIX RULES (SFX)
# Format: SFX <flag> <Y/N (cross-product)> <count>
#         SFX <flag> <strip> <add> <condition>
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════

# ── SFX A: Ezafe/Construct State suffix -ê / -a ───────────────────────────────
# In Kurmanci, the ezafe particle links nouns to adjectives/genitives.
# Masculine singular: adds -ê (mêr → mêrê)
# Feminine singular:  adds -a  (jin → jina)
SFX A Y 4
SFX A 0 ê  [^aeiouêîû]    # mêr → mêrê (masc, ends in consonant)
SFX A 0 yê [aeiouêîû]     # kur → kuryê (masc, ends in vowel)
SFX A 0 a  [^aeiouêîû]    # jin → jina  (fem, ends in consonant)
SFX A 0 ya [aeiouêîû]     # keç → keçya (fem, ends in vowel) — approximation

# ── SFX B: Plural suffix -an ──────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Standard Kurmanci plural: xwendekar → xwendekaran
SFX B Y 2
SFX B 0 an  [^n]           # kitêb → kitêban
SFX B n  an n              # xwendekar → xwendekaran (already ends in n — rare)

# ── SFX C: Plural suffix -în (for specific noun classes) ─────────────────────
SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 în  [^î]           # kur → kurîn — poetic/dialectal plural

# ── SFX D: Oblique case suffix -ê (direct → oblique) ─────────────────────────
# Singular oblique of masculine nouns
SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 î   [^iîy]        # consonant-final: mêr → mêrî
SFX D 0 yî  [aeiouêû]     # vowel-final noun in oblique

# ── SFX E: Verb personal suffixes (present tense) ────────────────────────────
# Present-tense endings vary by person and class.
# This is a simplified approximation — a full verb morphology system requires
# separate root stems per verb class in the .dic file.
SFX E Y 6
SFX E im im  .             # 1sg: ez dixwim
SFX E î  î   .             # 2sg: tu dixwî
SFX E e  e   .             # 3sg: ew dixwe
SFX E in in  .             # 1pl: em dixwin
SFX E in in  .             # 2pl: hûn dixwin
SFX E in in  .             # 3pl: ew dixwin

# ── SFX F: Diminutive suffix -ok ──────────────────────────────────────────────
SFX F Y 1
SFX F 0 ok  .              # kur → kurok (little boy)

# ── SFX G: Agentive suffix -er / -kar ────────────────────────────────────────
SFX G Y 2
SFX G 0 er  .              # xwend → xwender (reader)
SFX G 0 kar .              # xwend → xwendekar

# ── SFX H: Adjectival suffix -î (nisbet suffix) ──────────────────────────────
# Forms relational/nisbet adjectives: Kurd → Kurdî, welat → welatî
SFX H Y 2
SFX H 0 î   [^î]          # Kurd → Kurdî
SFX H 0 tî  [aeiouêîû]    # vowel-final

# ── SFX I: Verbal noun suffix -in ────────────────────────────────────────────
# Verbal infinitive: xwandin, xwendin, ketin
SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 in  .              # xwend → xwendin

# ── SFX J: Gerundive/masdar suffix -an ───────────────────────────────────────
SFX J Y 1
SFX J 0 an  .              # xwend → xwendan

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# PREFIX RULES (PFX)
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════

# ── PFX di-: Present-tense verb prefix ───────────────────────────────────────
# In Kurmanci present tense, the prefix di- is added to the verb stem.
# e.g. xwin → dixwin, bêj → dibêj
PFX P Y 1
PFX P 0 di .               # dixwe, dixwîn, dibêj, diçim…

# ── PFX na-: Negation prefix ─────────────────────────────────────────────────
# Kurmanci negation uses na- (present) or ne- (past/subjunctive)
PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 na .               # nadixwe, nabêj

PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 ne .               # neçû, nehat

# ── PFX bê-: Privative prefix ("without") ────────────────────────────────────
PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q 0 bê .               # bêmal (homeless), bêar (without honour)

# ── PFX xwe-: Reflexive prefix ───────────────────────────────────────────────
PFX R Y 1
PFX R 0 xwe .              # xwexistin, xwebawerkirin

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# END OF AFFIX FILE
#
# NEXT STEPS FOR CONTRIBUTORS:
# 1. Refine SFX E with proper verb class separation (Class I-VI in Kurmanci).
# 2. Add passive voice constructions (-hat-, -hêt-).
# 3. Add locative postpositions as separate suffix rules.
# 4. Validate all rules against a native Kurmanci grammar reference.
# 5. Test with the Ferheng.org dictionary wordlist.
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
