dictionary/ku_TR.dic
Alîgir/HK
Amadekirin/GK
Ambûlans/ABDK
Amûr/ABDK
Aramgeh/ABDK
Arşîv/ABDK
Asayî/HK
Asman/ABDK
Avahî/ABK
Axaftin/ABDK
Azadkirin/GK
Azadî/HK
Bacgir/ABDK
Bajêr/ABDK
Balkişandin/GK
Balkêş/HK
Bav/ABDK
Bawerî/ABK
Belavok/ABDK
Bendewar/HK
Berawirdkirin/GK
Berbiçav/HK
Berendam/ABDK
Berhem/ABDK
Berxwedan/ABDK
Bes/HK
Betalkirin/GK
Beze/ABK
Bihêz/HK
Binpêkirin/GK
Bipere/HK
Birak/ABDK
Birîndar/HK
Birûsk/ABDK
Biçûk/HK
Bêbawer/HK
Bêguman/HK
Bêkar/ABDK
Bêrêz/HK
Bîhnteng/HK
Bînahî/ABK
Bîranîn/GK
Bîrgeh/ABDK
Cins/ABDK
Civîn/ABDK
Cuda/HK
Cure/ABK
Cîgir/ABDK
Dabeşkirinê/ABDK
Dad/ABDK
Dadgeh/ABDK
Dakêşandin/GK
Danezanîn/GK
Darî/HK
Databas/ABK
Dawî/ABK
Daxwaz/ABDK
Dayîn/GK
Dengdar/HK
Dengnasî/ABK
Derhêner/ABDK
Derxistin/GK
Desthilat/ABDK
Destûr/ABDK
Dev/ABDK
Dewlemend/HK
Dilgerm/HK
Dilsoz/ABDK
Dirêj/HK
Diyarkirin/GK
Dohola/ABK
Dotmam/ABDK
Dîl/HK
Dîrokzan/ABDK
Dîsk/ABDK
Dûr/HK
Element/ABDK
Encam/ABDK
Endazyar/ABDK
Ezmûn/ABDK
Eşkere/HK
Fabrîqe/ABK
Fermanandin/GK
Fermangeh/ABDK
Feza/ABK
Firehî/ABK
Firîşte/HK
Format/ABDK
Frekans/ABDK
Fêrbûn/GK
Fêrgeh/ABDK
Gelêrî/HK
Gerok/ABDK
Geşepêdan/ABDK
Geşkirin/GK
Gihîştî/HK
Girtok/ABDK
Girêdayî/HK
Gog/ABDK
Gol/ABK
Guhdarîkirin/GK
Guncandin/GK
Gûz/ABK
Hawe/ABK
Hawirdor/ABDK
Helandin/GK
Helbet/HK
Helwest/ABDK
Hevaltî/HK
Hevkar/ABDK
Hevpeymankirin/GK
Hevpêç/ABDK
Hilbijartin/GK
Hilbijêr/ABDK
Hirç/ABK
Hizirkirin/GK
Hundir/ABDK
Hunermend/ABDK
Hêk/ABK
Hêsan/HK
Hîskirin/GK
Jenerator/ABDK
Jin/ABDK
Jiyan/ABDK
Jiyîn/GK
Kargeh/ABDK
Karmend/ABDK
Kelandî/HK
Kemilandin/GK
Kes/ABDK
Kilam/ABDK
Kirdarî/HK
Kirê/ABK
Kirîn/GK
Komela/ABHK
Komele/ABK
Komîsyon/ABDK
Kujtin/GK
Kurd/BHK
Kurdî/HK
Kêmasî/ABK
Kêmkirin/GK
Kûrs/ABDK
Labratuwar/ABDK
Ling/ABDK
Lênerîn/GK
Lînk/ABDK
Maddî/HK
Mafdar/ABDK
Malbat/ABDK
Malî/ABK
Mamosta/ABDK
Mazot/ABDK
Medya/ABK
Merc/ABDK
Metro/ABK
Mezinbûn/GK
Mifta/ABK
Mirin/GK
Monitor/ABDK
Mor/HK
Muxalefet/ABDK
Mîkrofon/ABDK
Mîmar/ABDK
Nav/ABDK
Nava/ABDK
Navend/ABDK
Navkirin/GK
Nefsbiçûk/HK
Nifş/ABDK
Nimûneyî/HK
Nivîs/ABDK
Nivîsar/ABDK
Nivîskarî/ABK
Nêzîkatî/ABK
Nêzîkbûn/GK
Pak/HK
Paket/ABDK
Panel/ABDK
Paqijkirin/GK
Parêzer/ABDK
Pejrandin/GK
Petrol/ABDK
Pez/ABK
Pirs/ABDK
Pispor/ABDK
Polîs/ABDK
Poşet/ABDK
Prakîkî/HK
Psîkolog/ABDK
Pêkanîn/GK
Pêkhate/ABK
Pêşbînîkirin/GK
Pêşnîyar/ABDK
Pîştevan/ABDK
Pûç/HK
Qamyon/ABDK
Qaçaxkirin/GK
Qedr/ABDK
Qewl/ABK
Qeydkirin/GK
Qirêj/HK
Radestkirin/GK
Radyo/ABK
Raman/ABDK
Rastkirinê/ABDK
Rawestandin/GK
Rev/ABDK
Rewakirin/GK
Robot/ABDK
Roj/ABDK
Ron/HK
Rêbaz/ABDK
Rêveber/ABDK
Rêvebirin/GK
Rêwî/ABDK
Rêziman/ABHK
Rûbar/ABK
Saet/ABDK
Saf/HK
Sal/ABDK
Saza/ABK
Sazkirin/GK
Ser/ABDK
Serbest/HK
Serfirazî/ABK
Serketin/GK
Serok/ABDK
Sexte/HK
Sivikî/ABK
Sorkirî/HK
Standin/GK
Sêtar/ABK
Sîber/ABK
Sîstem/ABDK
Tablo/ABK
Tal/HK
Taqîkirin/GK
Tav/ABDK
Teknîk/ABDK
Tekoşer/ABDK
Telem/ABDK
Tendurustî/HK
Term/ABDK
Text/ABDK
Tijîkirin/GK
Tor/ABDK
Tund/HK
Têkçûn/GK
Vegerandin/GK
Vejandin/GK
Vekolîner/ABDK
Vektor/ABDK
Veşartin/GK
Vîrus/ABDK
Wergirtin/GK
Wiha/HK
Wênegir/ABDK
Xal/ABDK
Xanî/ABDK
Xemgîn/HK
Xemilandin/GK
Xuyakirin/GK
Xuşk/ABDK
Yekgirtî/HK
Zagon/ABDK
Zanebûn/GK
Zanyar/ABDK
Zar/ABDK
Zelal/HK
Zindan/ABDK
Ziyankirin/GK
Zêrîn/HK
Zîhniyet/ABDK
aborî/ABK
afirandin/GK
alîkar/HK
amadekirin/GK
aparat/ABDK
arşîv/ABDK
awaz/ABDK
azadkirin/GK
azadîxwaz/HK
babet/ABDK
bajêr/ABDK
balkişandin/GK
bar/ABDK
belge/ABK
beranber/HK
berawirdkirin/GK
berendam/ABDK
betal/HK
betalkirin/GK
binpêkirin/GK
bira/ABDK
birinc/ABK
biryardar/HK
birûsk/ABDK
bor/HK
bêguneh/HK
bîranîn/GK
ceyran/ABDK
ciddî/HK
cins/ABDK
cure/ABK
dabeşker/ABDK
dakêşandin/GK
danehev/ABK
danezanîn/GK
dar/ABDK
dawî/ABK
dayîn/GK
degmen/HK
derxistin/GK
dest/ABDK
dev/ABDK
dijber/HK
dil/ABDK
diyarkirin/GK
domdar/HK
dîmender/ABDK
dîrok/ABDK
dîsk/ABDK
encam/ABDK
erzanî/ABK
ewle/HK
fabrîqe/ABK
ferman/ABDK
fermanandin/GK
fizîk/ABK
frekans/ABDK
fêmdar/HK
fêrbûn/GK
geşkirin/GK
geştiyar/ABDK
giran/HK
giringî/ABK
gol/ABK
guhdarîkirin/GK
guncandin/GK
gund/ABDK
hejarî/ABK
helandin/GK
hemdem/HK
hevkar/ABDK
hevpeyman/ABDK
hevpeymankirin/GK
hizirkirin/GK
holding/ABDK
hunerî/HK
hêk/ABK
jinik/ABDK
jiyîn/GK
jîr/HK
kal/ABDK
karmend/ABDK
katalog/ABDK
kevneşopî/HK
kirîn/GK
kod/ABDK
kom/ABDK
komele/ABK
kulturî/HK
kêmkirin/GK
kîlo/ABK
labratuwar/ABDK
lawik/ABDK
lazim/HK
mal/ABDK
mamosta/ABDK
meh/ABDK
mekanîk/ABK
mezin/HK
mezinbûn/GK
mifta/ABK
motor/ABDK
mêwe/ABK
mîmar/ABDK
nav/ABDK
navkirin/GK
navîn/HK
newroz/BHK
nexweşxane/ABDK
nivîs/ABDK
nûdar/HK
nûner/ABDK
paket/ABDK
paqijkirin/GK
parêzer/ABDK
peyv/ABDK
pijiyayî/HK
pirsgirêk/ABDK
polîs/ABDK
portal/ABDK
pêkanîn/GK
pêşangeh/ABDK
pêşkeftî/HK
pîştevan/ABDK
qaçaxkirin/GK
qelp/HK
qonax/ABDK
radestkirin/GK
ragihandin/ABDK
rastkirinê/ABDK
rewakirin/GK
rewşenbîr/ABDK
reş/HK
rojnamevan/ABDK
rêveber/ABDK
rêziman/ABHK
rûerd/ABDK
saet/ABDK
sax/HK
saza/ABK
sazkirin/GK
sereke/HK
serhildêr/ABDK
serkêş/ABDK
sivikî/ABK
sivr/HK
standin/GK
sînor/ABDK
sîyasî/HK
tav/ABDK
tek/HK
teknîk/ABDK
temen/ABDK
tevahî/HK
text/ABDK
tijîkirin/GK
vala/HK
veberhênan/ABDK
vegerandin/GK
vekolîner/ABDK
veşartin/GK
vîrus/ABDK
wêjekar/ABDK
xanî/ABDK
xas/HK
xemilandin/GK
xulek/ABDK
xweza/ABK
xweş/HK
zana/HK
zanebûn/GK
zanyar/ABDK
zanîngeh/ABDK
zimanewanî/ABK
zindan/ABDK
zirav/HK
Çalakbûn/GK
Çand/ABHK
Çandî/HK
Çem/ABK
Çêkirinê/ABDK
Êvar/ABDK
Êşandin/GK
çapxane/ABK
çavbirçî/HK
çavkanî/ABK
çerx/ABDK
çêkirin/GK
çêlek/ABK
îkon/ABDK
Şand/ABDK
Şivan/ABK
Şiyar/HK
Şopandin/GK
Şîfre/ABDK
şelû/HK
şewq/ABDK
şoreşger/ABDK
şêwe/ABK
şîrovekirin/GK
